Hawaii statutes.
[§46-4.5] Ordinances establishing
historical, cultural, and scenic districts. No ordinance to establish a
historical, cultural, and scenic district around the environs of the Hawaii
state capitol shall be valid unless the requirements and objectives in creating
such a district and the criteria and procedure to determine whether a proposed
improvement would in fact accomplish such objectives and requirements are first
approved by the governor of the State; provided further that the State need not
conform to any decision relating to any state property within such district if
it determines that such decision is not in conformance to the criteria and
procedures previously approved or that such decision cannot be accomplished
because of funding limitations.

No requirement under any existing ordinance
relating to the construction, alteration, repair, relocation or demolition of
any structure within any historical, cultural, and scenic district of which the
Hawaii state capitol is a part shall be effective as to any state property
until the objectives and requirements and the criteria and procedures required
by this section have been approved by the governor of the State. [L 1973, c
215, §§1, 2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next